Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 31. Hospitality Stations on Highways

§ 65-31-1.
Design, construction, and operation.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized to locate, design, construct, operate, and maintain hospitality stations on trunkline highways at or near points of entry into this state from other states. In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall have authority to employ such engineers, architects, skilled and unskilled labor as may be determined necessary by the commission, for the preparation of plans for such hospitality stations and their proper location, design, construction, maintenance, and operation. The commission also may employ full-time security officers, as authorized under Section 65-1-131, and/or may contract for the employment of private security officers, as authorized under Section 65-1-136, to patrol and protect the property of hospitality stations and visitors, patrons and other employees of hospitality stations.

Prior to the location of such hospitality stations the commission shall afford the opportunity for a public hearing in the county wherein such hospitality station is to be located for the purpose of receiving testimony regarding the most feasible and advantageous location for such hospitality station, at which hearing all interested persons may appear and present testimony in regard thereto. A notice of such proposed location shall be given in some newspaper published or having general circulation in the county wherein such hospitality station is proposed to be located. Should a public hearing be requested thereon, notice by publication shall be given at least ten (10) days prior to the date upon which public hearing is to be held and written notice thereof shall likewise be given, within said time, to the governing authorities of all municipalities within such county and the governing authority of such county.

Each hospitality station constructed under the provisions of this chapter shall be maintained and kept in a neat and attractive condition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-71; Laws, 1968, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 425, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 65-31-3.
Contracts for operation.

The State Highway Commission is authorized to contract with the Department of Economic and Community Development, on terms and conditions agreeable between the two (2) state agencies, for the operation of one or more of such hospitality stations constructed under the provisions of this chapter. The commission and the department are further authorized to enter into agreement with an adjoining state for the operation of a hospitality station on an interstate highway where the states’ boundary is the Mississippi River and there is no feasible location for a hospitality station between the bank of the Mississippi River and a national military park in the State of Mississippi, or where the states’ boundary is the Pearl River and there is no feasible location for a hospitality station between the bank of the Pearl River and the buffer zone to a test facility operated by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration in the State of Mississippi. The commission and the department are authorized to pay whatever expenses may be agreed upon between the two (2) states as to the fair share of the operating and maintenance cost of the hospitality station operated primarily for the benefit of the state. Such contracts and agreements shall provide for the furnishing of suitable personnel for the operation of such stations and that such stations shall be kept supplied with such information, pamphlets and other materials as will advertise and publicize the history, commerce, industry, natural resources and tourist attractions of this state. Such information, pamphlets and other materials shall be available to the traveling public and shall be distributed by the personnel employed to operate such stations. The agency operating such hospitality stations shall provide for the free distribution to the traveling public of such literature, pamphlets, refreshments and other items that may be of interest to tourists in such manner as deemed to be in the best interest of promoting the tourist trade in this state. Such agency may sell, or contract for the sale of, merchandise on the premises of any hospitality station, provided such sale or contract for sale is subject to any applicable federal laws and Section 43-3-93. Revenue derived from such sales shall be paid into the special revolving fund established pursuant to Section 57-1-66 and shall be expended to promote and market Mississippi and to maintain and improve hospitality stations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-72; Laws, 1968, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 444, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 579, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 65-31-5.
Acceptance of gifts and grants.

Both the State Highway Commission and the agricultural and industrial board in exercising the powers granted in this chapter are hereby authorized to accept private donations and public grants which may be available to them, respectively, for the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. In addition thereto, either or both of such agencies may expend, for the purposes of this chapter, any funds available to them not otherwise specifically designated for a different public purpose. Each of such agencies shall cooperate with other state agencies in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-73; Laws, 1968, ch. 474, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 65-31-7.
Commemorative sign; birthplace of Jimmie Rodgers.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized, in the event private donations are made available therefor, to erect an appropriate commemorative sign at the state hospitality station located on federal Interstate Highway 20 east of Meridian, Mississippi, to read as follows:

“WELCOME TO MISSISSIPPI BIRTHPLACE OF JIMMIE RODGERS THE FATHER OF COUNTRY MUSIC”Such sign shall be attractive and designed to invite and encourage tourism and recreation in the state.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby authorized to accept and expend private donations for the purchase, installation and maintenance of the sign authorized hereunder. No state funds shall be expended for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 329, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 65-31-9.
“Senator Delma Furniss Hospitality Station” designated.

The state hospitality station constructed and located at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49 and U.S. Highway 61 in Coahoma County is designated and shall be known as the “Senator Delma Furniss Hospitality Station.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain suitable signs at and approaching the hospitality station, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2003.).

§ 65-31-11.
Katrina volunteers memorial fountain.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, by order duly adopted and entered upon its official minutes, may authorize the Katrina Volunteers Memorial Fountain Committee, acting under board approved sponsorship of the Diamondhead Continuing Education, Inc., and at its own expense, to design, construct and maintain at a location approved by the commission on property of the welcome center near I-10 in western Hancock County, a fountain and suitable memorial in recognition and appreciation of the thousands of volunteers who donated their time and money to assist the citizens of Mississippi in recovering from the destruction and in the rebuilding efforts following Hurricane Katrina.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 545, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2007.).

§ 65-31-13.
“‘Dizzy’ Dean Rest Area” designated.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation rest area located along U.S. Highway 49 in Wiggins, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “‘Dizzy’ Dean Rest Area.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain suitable signs at and approaching the rest area, reflecting its name, and may place a plaque at such rest area in memory of Dizzy’s extraordinary contributions to the sport of baseball.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2007.).

§ 65-31-15.
“Capers, Blake, Scales Rest Area” designated.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation rest area located along U.S. Highway 49 in Pocahontas, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Capers, Blake, Scales Rest Area.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain suitable signs at and approaching the rest area, reflecting its name, and may place a plaque at such rest area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 510, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 2008.).